New York, session 2025-2026, S7128.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 326 of the laws of 2006 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the county of Hamilton to impose a coun- 3 ty recording tax on obligations secured by mortgages on real property, 4 as amended by chapter 348 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 7 deemed repealed December 1, [2025] 2027. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11481-01-5